Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1505YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 371 Section 1. Section 280.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 280.13 Requirements for interscholastic athletic contests and 3 competitions. 4 1. A public school shall not participate in or allow 5 students representing a public school to participate in any 6 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition 7 which is sponsored or administered by an organization as 8 defined in this section , unless the organization is registered 9 with the department of education, files financial statements 10 with the department in the form and at the intervals prescribed 11 by the director of the department of education, and is in 12 compliance with rules which the state board of education adopts 13 for the proper administration, supervision, operation, adoption 14 of eligibility requirements, and scheduling of extracurricular 15 interscholastic athletic contests and competitions and the 16 organizations. 17 2. a. For the purposes of this section âorganizationâ means 18 a corporation, association, or organization to which all of the 19 following apply: 20 (1) It has as one of its primary purposes the sponsoring 21 or administration of extracurricular interscholastic athletic 22 contests or competitions , but . 23 (2) It does not prohibit member schools from participating 24 in extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests and 25 competitions with nonmember schools. 26 b. âOrganizationâ does not include an agency of this state, 27 a public or private school or school board, or an athletic 28 conference or other association whose interscholastic contests 29 or competitions do not include more than twenty-four schools. 30